nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Cosmetica > Cosmetische hulpmiddelen > Hulpmiddelen voor nagelverzorging: Nagelriemknipper; Bokkenpootjes; Nagelriemknippers; Teenscheiders voor voetverzorging; Manicuresets; Nagelborstels; Nagelbuffers; Nagelschaartjes; Accessoires voor nagelboren; Nagelboren; Nageldrogers; Nagelvijlen; Nagel vormen en mallen; Nagel stempel platen
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Kozmetika > Kozmetické nástroje > Nástroje na úpravu nechtov: Kliešte na kožičku; Zatláčače nechtovej kožičky; Nožnice na nechtovú kožičku; Podložky na manikúru a pedikúru; Súpravy nástrojov na manikúru; Kefky na nechty; Leštičky na nechty; Klieštiky na nechty; Príslušenstvo pre brúsku na nechty; Brúsky na nechty; Lampy na manikúru; Pilníky na nechty; Formy a šablóny na nechty; Pečiatkovacie platne na nechty
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Cosmetics > Cosmetic Tools > Nail Tools: Cuticle Nippers; Cuticle Pushers; Cuticle Scissors; Manicure & Pedicure Spacers; Manicure Tool Sets; Nail Brushes; Nail Buffers; Nail Clippers; Nail Drill Accessories; Nail Drills; Nail Dryers; Nail Files & Emery Boards; Nail Forms & Molds; Nail Stamping Plates
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 化妆品 > 美容工具 > 美甲工具: 死皮钳; 推皮棒/去死皮刀; 角质剪; 美甲分离器; 修甲工具套装; 指甲刷; 指甲锉; 指甲剪; 钻钉机配件; 美甲打磨机; 指甲烘干机; 指甲锉/指甲砂锉; 美甲模具; 美甲印花板
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Kosmetikk > Kosmetikkverktøy > Negleverktøy: Neglebåndknipere; Neglebåndsskyvere; Neglebåndssakser; Manikyr- og pedikyrputer; Verktøysett for manikyr; Neglebørster; Neglebuffere; Negleklippere; Tilbehør for neglebor; Neglebor; Negletørkere; Neglefiler og neglebrett; Negleformer og støpeformer; Neglestemplingsplater
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Kozmetikumok > Kozmetikai eszközök > Körömeszközök: Körömágycsípők; Körömágy-visszatoló; Körömágyollók; Manikűr és pedikűr távtartók; Manikűr eszközkészletek; Körömkefék; Körömsimítók; Körömvágók; Körömfúró-kiegészítők; Körömfúrók; Körömszárítók; Körömreszelők és csiszolólapok; Körömformák és öntőformák; Körömmintázó lemezek
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Kosmetiikka > Kosmetiikkatarvikkeet > Kynsienhoitovälineet: Kynsinauhanleikkuri; Kynsinauhatyöntimet; Kynsinauhasakset; Varpaiden ja sormien erottajat; Manikyyrivälinesetit; Kynsiharja; Kynsien kiillotusviilat; Kynsileikkurit; Kynsiporan lisätarvikket; Kynsiporat; Kynsien kuivauslaitteet; Kynsiviilat; Kynsimuotti ja -malli; Kynsien kuviolevyke
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cosméticos > Ferramentas cosméticas > Ferramentas para unhas: Alicates de cutícula; Empurradores de cutículas; Alicates de cutículas; Separador de dedos para pedicure; Conjuntos de utensílios para manicure; Escovas de unha; Polidores de unhas; Cortadores de unhas; Acessórios de lixa elétrica; Lixa elétrica de unha; Secadores de unhas; Lixas comuns e lixas metálicas de unhas; Moldes e formas para unhas; Placas de carimbo para unhas
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Kosmetika > Kosmetické pomůcky > Pomůcky na nehty: Kleštičky na nehtovou kůžičku; Kleštičky na kůži; Nůžky na kůžičku; Separátory prstů; Sady na manikúru; Kartáčky na nehty; Brusné bloky na nehty; Kleště na nehty; Příslušenství k bruskám na nehty; Brusky na nehty; Sušičky nehtů; Pilníky a špachtle; Šablony a formy na nehty; Razítkové destičky na nehty
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Cosmetice > Instrumente cosmetice > Instrumente pentru îngrijirea unghiilor: Clești pentru cuticule; Dispozitive pentru împingerea cuticulei; Foarfeci pentru cuticule; Distanțiere pentru manichiură și pedichiură; Seturi de instrumente pentru manichiura; Perii pentru unghii; Buffere pentru unghii; Unghiere; Accesorii pentru freză unghii; Freze pentru unghii; Uscătoare pentru unghii; Pile de unghii și pile cu șmirghel; Forme și tipare pentru unghii; Plăci de ștampilare pentru unghii
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Kosmetik > Kosmetiske redskaber > Negleredskaber: Neglebåndsklippere; Neglebåndsskubbere; Neglebåndsklippere; Tådelere til pedicure; Redskabssæt til manicure; Neglebørster; Neglepolerere; Negleklippere; Tilbehør til neglebor; Neglebor; Negletørrere; Neglefiler og sandfiler; Negleforme; Neglestemplingsplader
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 화장품 > 화장 도구 > 네일아트 도구: 큐티클 니퍼; 큐티클 푸셔; 큐티클 가위; 매니큐어/페디큐어 세퍼레이터; 손톱 손질 세트; 네일 브러시; 손톱 광택기; 손톱깎이; 네일 드릴 부대용품; 네일 드릴; 네일 건조기; 손톱 줄; 네일 폼 및 몰드; 네일 스탬핑 플레이트
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cosmetici > Utensili cosmetici > Accessori cura delle unghie: Pinzette per le cuticole; Tagliacuticole; Spingicuticole; Separatori di dita per manicure e pedicure; Set per manicure; Spazzole per unghie; Lucida unghie; Tronchesini; Accessori fresa per unghie; Frese per unghie; Asciugaunghie; Limette per unghie; Forme e stampi per unghie; Piastre per stamping unghie
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Kosmetyki > Akcesoria kosmetyczne > Akcesoria do paznokci: Cążki do skórek; Kopytka do skórek; Nożyczki do skórek; Separatory palców do pedicure; Zestawy do manicure; Szczoteczki do paznokci; Polerki do paznokci; Cążki do paznokci; Akcesoria do frezarek do paznokci; Wiertła do paznokci; Suszarki do paznokci; Pilniczki; Formy i szablony do paznokci; Płytki do stemplowania paznokci
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Kozmetik > Kozmetik Aletleri > Tırnak Bakım Aletleri: Kütikül Makasları; Manikür Çubukları; Manikür Makasları; Manikür ve Pedikür Parmak Ayraçları; Manikür Alet Setleri; Tırnak Fırçaları; Tırnak Parlatıcı Törpüler; Tırnak Makasları; Elektrikli Törpü Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Törpüler; Oje Kurutucular; Tırnak Törpüleri ve Kağıt Törpüler; Tırnak Formları ve Kalıpları; Tırnak Damgalama Plakaları
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 化妝品 > 美妝工具 > 美甲工具: 指皮鉗; 去皮器; 修皮剪; 美甲美足隔板; 美甲工具組; 指甲刷; 指甲銼; 指甲剪; 磨甲機配件; 磨甲機; 指甲乾燥機; 釘子磨平片/板; 指甲模具; 指甲印章板
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Козметика > Козметични инструменти > Инструменти за нокти: Клещи за кожички; Избутвачи на кожички; Ножици за кожички; Разделители за маникюр и педикюр; Комплекти инструменти за маникюр; Четки за нокти; Буфер пили за нокти; Нокторезачки; Аксесоари за електрически пили за нокти; Електрически пили за нокти; Уреди за сушене на нокти; Пили за нокти; Форми и шаблони за нокти; Плочки за щампа за нокти
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Косметика > Косметические инструменты > Инструменты для маникюра и педикюра: Кусачки для кутикулы; Пушеры для кутикулы; Ножницы для кутикулы; Разделители пальцев для маникюра и педикюра; Маникюрные наборы; Щетки для ногтей; Бафы для полировки ногтей; Кусачки для ногтей; Аксессуары для аппаратов для маникюра и педикюра; Аппараты для маникюра и педикюра; Лампы для сушки ногтей; Пилки для ногтей; Формы и молды для ногтей; Пластины для стемпинга
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Cosmétiques > Accessoires cosmétiques > Accessoires pour les ongles: Pinces à cuticules; Repousse-cuticules; Coupe-cuticules; Séparateurs de doigts pour manucure et pédicure; Kits de manucure; Brosses à ongles; Polissoirs; Coupe-ongles; Accessoires de ponceuses à ongles; Ponceuses à ongles; Séchoirs à ongles; Limes à ongles et limes émeri; Formes et moules pour ongles; Plaques de stamping pour ongles
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Kosmetika > Kosmetik-Zubehör > Maniküre & Pediküre: Nagelhautzangen; Nagelhautschieber; Nagelhautscheren; Finger- & Zehenspreizer; Maniküre-Sets; Nagelbürsten; Nagelpolierer; Nagelknipser; Nagelpiercing-Zubehör; Nagelfräser; Nageltrockner; Nagelfeilen & Sandblattfeilen; Nagelformen & -schablonen; Nagelstempelplatten
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Καλλυντικά > Καλλυντικά εργαλεία > Εργαλεία νυχιών: Ψαλιδάκια παρανυχίδων; Εργαλεία που σπρώχνουν τα πετσάκια των νυχιών; Ψαλιδάκια για τα πετσάκια των νυχιών; Διαχωριστές δαχτύλων για μανικιούρ & πεντικιούρ; Σετ εργαλείων μανικιούρ; Βουρτσάκια νυχιών; Buffer νυχιών; Νυχοκόπτες; Αξεσουάρ τροχών νυχιών; Τροχοί νυχιών; Στεγνωτήρες νυχιών; Λίμες & σμυριδόχαρτα νυχιών; Φόρμες νυχιών; Πλάκες σφράγισης νυχιών
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Kosmetika > Kosmetikverktyg > Nagelverktyg: Nagelbandstänger; Nagelbandstrimrar; Nagelbandssaxar; Tåseparatorer för pedikyr; Manikyretuier; Nagelborstar; Nagelpolerare; Nagelsaxar; Tillbehör till nagelborrar; Nagelborrar; Nageltorkare; Nagelfilar och sandpappersfilar; Nagelformer och formar; Nagelstämplingsplattor
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Kozmetika > Kozmetički alati > Alati za nokte: Kliješta za zanoktice; Gurači zanoktica; Škare za kožicu oko noktiju; Separatori za manikuru i pedikuru; Kompleti alata za manikuru; Kistovi za nokte; Polirne turpije za nokte; Grickalice za nokte; Pribor za brusilice za nokte; Brusilice za nokte; Uređaji za sušenje noktiju; Turpije i rašpice za nokte; Oblici i kalupi za nokte; Pločice za pečatiranje noktiju
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Mỹ phẩm > Dụng cụ trang điểm mỹ phẩm > Bộ dụng cụ làm móng: Kìm cắt da chết móng; Sủi da; Kéo tỉa mũi thẳng; Bộ tách ngón làm móng; Bộ dụng cụ chăm sóc móng tay; Bàn chải làm móng; Mài móng tay; Bấm móng tay; Phụ kiện máy dũa móng; Máy mài móng; Máy sấy khô móng; Giũa móng tay; Khuôn móng; Bản in móng
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cosméticos > Objetos cosméticos > Objetos para uñas: Cortacutículas; Empujacutículas; Tijeras para cutículas; Separadores de manicura y pedicura; Juegos de útiles para manicura; Cepillos de uñas; Limas abrillantadoras; Cortaúñas; Accesorios para pulidoras de uñas; Perforadoras para uñas; Secadores de uñas; Limas de uñas y limas de esmeril; Moldes y formas de uñas; Placas de estampado de uñas
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Kozmetika > Kozmetični pripomočki > Pripomočki za nohte: Klešče za obnohtno kožico; Odstranjevalci obnohtne kožice; Škarje za obnohtno kožico; Distančniki za manikuro in pedikuro; Kompleti pripomočkov za manikuro; Krtačke za nohte; Polirni bloki; Škarjice za nohte; Dodatki za vrtalnike za nohte; Vrtalniki za nohte; Sušilci za nohte; Pilice za nohte in brusi za nohtno ploščo; Šablone in kalupi za nohte; Ploščice za žigosanje nohtov
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > コスメ・スキンケア > メイク道具・ネイルケア用品 > ネイルケア用品: キューティクルニッパー; キューティクルプッシャー; キューティクルニッパー; ペディキュア用トゥセパレーター; マニキュアセット; ネイルブラシ; ネイルバッファー・爪磨き; 爪切り; ネイルマシン関連用品; ネイルマシン; ネイルドライヤー; ネイルファイル・爪やすり; ネイルフォーム・モールド; ネイルスタンピングプレート
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > เครื่องสำอาง > เครื่องมือของเครื่องสำอาง > อุปกรณ์ทำเล็บ: คีมตัดหนังเล็บ; ที่ดันหนัง; กรรไกรตัดหนัง; สเปซเซอร์สำหรับการทำเล็บมือและเท้า; ชุดเครื่องมือทำเล็บ; แปรงทำความสะอาดเล็บ; บัฟเฟอร์สำหรับเล็บ; ที่ตัดเล็บ; อุปกรณ์เจาะตกแต่งเล็บ; เครื่องเจียเล็บ; เครื่องที่ทำให้แห้งสำหรับเล็บ; ที่ตะไบเล็บ; แบบฟอร์มและแม่พิมพ์ทำเล็บ; แผ่นปั๊มลายเล็บ
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Kosmetika > Kosmetikos įrankiai > Manikiūro įrankiai: Odelių žirklutės; Odelių stūmikliai; Odelių žirklės; Manikiūro ir pedikiūro tarpikliai; Manikiūro įrankių rinkiniai; Nagų šepetėliai; Nagų buferiai; Nagų karpikliai; Nagų gręžimo priedai; Nagų gręžtuvai; Nagų džiovintuvai; Nagų dildės ir švitrinės lentos; Nagų formos ir šablonai; Nagų štampavimo plokštelės
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cosmética > Equipamento de cosmética > Equipamento para as unhas: Alicates de cutículas; Empurra-cutículas; Tesouras para cutículas; Espaçadores de manicura e pedicura; Conjuntos de ferramenta de manicura; Escovas para unhas; Esponjas para unhas; Corta-unhas; Acessórios para limar as unhas; Dispositivos para limar as unhas; Secadores de unhas; Limas para unhas; Moldes e formas para unhas; Placas de carimbo para unhas